src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_affixes.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_IRREGULARS
! Irregular forms of ôsi
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg:nitôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg:kitôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg:otôt OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl:nitôtinân OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl:kitôtinaw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl:kitôtiwâw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl:otôtiwâw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl:otôtiyiw OSI_SUFFIXES ;
! Locative combos
ôsi+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc:nitôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc:kitôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc:otôtihk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc:nitôtinâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px12Pl+Loc:kitôtinâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc:kitôtiwâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc:otôtiwâhk # ;
ôsi+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc:otôtiyihk # ;
! Regular forms of atim, which cannot be possessed
! atim+N+A+Sg:atim # ;
! atim+N+A+Pl:atimwak # ;
! atim+N+A+Obv:atimwa # ;
! atim+N+A+Loc:atimohk # ;
! "Irregular" forms of atim, which are the ones that can be possessed
! @P.person.NI@atim+N+A:@P.person.NI@nitêm NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @P.person.KI@atim+N+A:@P.person.KI@kitêm NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;
! @P.person.O@atim+N+A:@P.person.O@otêm NA_DIM_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON OSI_SUFFIXES
+Sg:0 # ;
+Pl:a # ;

! Case-specific continuation lexica for -im/0 and -is/-isis

LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM
@U.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@U.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NA ;

! NI

LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM
@U.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@U.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NI ;

! NAD 

LEXICON NAD_SG/A
@U.sg.A@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_SG/A_DIM/IS
@U.sg.A@ NAD_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NAD ;

! NID

LEXICON NID_SG/I
@U.sg.I@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_SG/I_DIM/IS
@U.sg.I@ NID_DIM/IS ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM
@P.im.IM@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.im.IM@@P.is.IS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.im.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NID ;

!! NOUN_ENDLEX for wrapping up various things

LEXICON NOUN_ENDLEX
! Adding diminutive trigger to lexicalized diminutives to palatalize potential poss. person prefixes
@R.dim.DIM@:@R.dim.DIM@%^DIM # ;
@D.dim@ # ;

!! End of noun affixes code
